de: Tiere & Tierbedarf > Haustierbedarf > Zierfisch- Aquarien- und Teichbedarf > Ausströmersteine & Diffusoren für Aquarien: Luftverteiler; Scheibenluftsteine; Standard-Luftsteine; Rohrausströmer; Wandausströmer
vi: Đồ dùng cho động vật & thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho cá & động vật thủy sinh > Máy sục khí & khuếch tán bể thủy sinh: Đầu sủi oxy; Đĩa sủi oxy; Đĩa sủi oxy tiêu chuẩn; Thanh sủi oxy; Đá sủi tạo tường bóng
ru: Животные и товары для питомцев > Товары для домашних животных > Товары для рыб и аквариумов > Распылители-камни и диффузоры для аквариума: Диффузоры; Распылители-камни в форме диска; Стандартные распылители-камни; Распылители-камни в форме трубки; Настенные распылители-камни
nl: Dieren > Benodigdheden voor huisdieren > Benodigdheden voor vissen en water > Beluchtingssteen voor aquariums: Luchtverspreiders; Beluchtingssteen in schijfvorm; Standaard beluchtingssteen; Beluchtingssteen in leidingvorm; Beluchtingssteen in muurvorm
nb: Produkter til dyr og husdyr > Husdyrprodukter > Fiske- og vannutstyr > Luftstener og diffusere til akvarier: Luftdiffusorer; Skiveluftstener; Standard luftstener; Rørluftstener; Veggluftstener
pl: Zwierzęta i artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły i akcesoria dla rybek > Kamienie napowietrzające i dyfuzory: Dyfuzory do akwarium; Dyski napowietrzające; Standardowe kamienie napowietrzające; Kamienie napowietrzające w rurce; Kamienie napowietrzające ścienne
tr: Hayvanlar ve Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Balık ve Su Malzemeleri > Akvaryum Hava Taşları ve Difüzörleri: Hava Difüzörleri; Disk Hava Taşları; Standart Hava Taşları; Boru Hava Taşları; Duvar Hava Taşları
da: Dyr og tilbehør til kæledyr > Tilbehør til kæledyr > Fisk og vandforsyninger > Luftsten og luftdiffusere til akvarier: Luftdiffusere; Luftsten i skiver; Standardluftsten; Aflange luftsten; Vægluftsten
fi: Eläinten ja lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Kala- ja akvaariotarvikkeet > Akvaarion ilmakivet ja diffuusorit: Ilmadiffuusorit; Levyilmakivet; Tavalliset ilmakivet; Putki-ilmakivet; Seinäilmakivet
bg-BG: Артикули за животни и домашни любимци > Артикули за домашни любимци > Риби и артикули за акваристика > Камъни за кислород и дифузери: Въздушни дифузери; Плоски камъни за кислород; Стандартни камъни въздух; Тръбни камъни за въздух; Стенни камъни за въздух
ja: ペット・ペット用品 > ペット用品 > 魚・水産用品 > アクアリウム用エアストーン・ディフューザー: エアディフューザー; ディスク エアストーン; 標準エアストーン; チューブ エアストーン; 壁付けエアストーン
sl-SI: Živali in pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za ribe in vodne živali > Akvarijski zračni kamni in difuzorji: Zračni difuzorji; Ploščati zračni kamni; Standardni zračni kamni; Cevasti zračni kamni; Stenski zračni kamni
fr: Animaux et articles pour animaux de compagnie > Articles pour animaux de compagnie > Poissons et fournitures aquatiques > Diffuseurs et pierres à air pour aquariums: Diffuseurs d’air; Pierres à air en disque; Pierres à air standard; Pierres à air tubulaires; Pierres à air murales
ro-RO: Animale și articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru pești și acvaristică > Pietre și difuzoare de aer pentru acvariu: Difuzoare de aer; Pietre de aer în formă de disc; Pietre de aer standard; Pietre de aer în formă de tub; Pietre de aer pentru perete
es: Productos para mascotas y animales > Productos para mascotas > Suministros para peces y acuarios > Difusores y bombas de aire para acuarios: Difusores de aire; Piedras difusoras de aire de disco; Piedras difusoras de aire estándar; Piedras difusoras de aire de tubo; Piedras difusoras de aire de pared
sk-SK: Potreby pre zvieratá a domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre rybička a akváriá > Akvarijné vzduchovacie kamene a difúzory: Vzduchové difúzory; Platňové vzduchovacie kamene; Štandardné vzduchovacie kamene; Hadičkové vzduchovacie kamene; Nástenné vzduchovacie kamene
zh-CN: 动物/宠物用品 > 宠物用品 > 鱼类和水族用品 > 水族馆气泡石/空气扩散器: 空气扩散器; 圆盘气泡石; 标准气泡石; 管状气泡石; 墙壁气泡石
zh-TW: 動物/寵物補給品 > 寵物用品 > 魚和水族用品 > 水族箱氣泡石/散氣條: 溶氧器; 圓盤氣泡石; 標準氣泡石; 管狀氣泡石; 壁掛氣泡石
pt-PT: Artigos para animais e animais estimação > Artigos para animais > Artigos aquáticos e para peixes > Difusores e pedra do ar para aquários: Difusores de ar; Pedras de ar em disco; Pedras de ar padrão; Pedras de ar cilíndricas; Pedras de ar para a parede
th: อุปกรณ์สำหรับสัตว์และสัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์สัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์ทางน้ำและปลา > หินเพิ่มอากาศและตัวควบคุมอากาศสำหรับตู้ปลา: เครื่องกระจายอากาศ; หินเพิ่มอากาศแบบดิสก์; หินเพิ่มอากาศมาตรฐาน; หินเพิ่มอากาศแบบท่อ; หินเพิ่มอากาศแบบผนัง
hu: Állatok és kisállatkellékek > Háziállat-kellékek > Hal- és vízi kellékek > Akváriumi levegőkövek és diffúzorok: Légdiffúzorok; Lemezlégkövek; Szabványos légkövek; Csőlégkövek; Fallégkövek
cs: Chovatelství > Potřeby pro domácí zvířata > Potřeby pro ryby a vodní živočichy > Vzduchovací kameny a difuzéry pro akvária: Vzduchové difusory; Vzduchovací kameny ve tvaru disku; Standardní vzduchovací kameny; Válcové vzduchovací kameny; Vzduchovací stěny
sv: Djur och tillbehör till husdjur > Tillbehör till husdjur > Fisk och vattentillbehör > Syrestenar och diffusorer till akvarium: Luftspridare; Skivluftstenar; Standardluftstenar; Tubluftstenar; Vägggluftstenar
pt-BR: Animais e produtos para animais de estimação > Suprimentos para animais de estimação > Peixes e suprimentos aquáticos > Difusores e pedras de ar para aquários: Difusores de ar; Pedras de ar de disco; Pedras de ar padrão; Pedras de ar de tubo; Pedras de ar de parede
it: Articoli per animali > Animali domestici - Articoli > Forniture ittiche e acquatiche > Aeratori e pietre porose per acquari: Diffusori d'aria; Pietre porose a disco; Pietre porose standard; Pietre porose a tubo; Pietre aeree da muro
lt-LT: Gyvūnai ir prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės žuvims ir kitiems vandens gyvūnams > Akvariumų „oro akmenys“ ir difuzoriai: Oro difuzoriai; Diskiniai „oro akmenys“; Standartiniai „oro akmenys“; Vamzdiniai „oro akmenys“; Sieniniai „oro akmenys“
el: Ζώα και προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για ψάρια & υδρόβια ζώα > Πέτρες αέρα και διαχυτές ενυδρείου: Διαχυτές αέρα; Δίσκοι αερισμού (πέτρες αέρα σε σχήμα δίσκου); Τυπικές πέτρες αέρα; Πέτρες αέρα σε σχήμα σωλήνα; Πέτρες αέρα για τοίχους
en: Animals & Pet Supplies > Pet Supplies > Fish & Aquatic Supplies > Aquarium Air Stones & Diffusers: Air Diffusers; Disc Air Stones; Standard Air Stones; Tube Air Stones; Wall Air Stones
ko: 동물/반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 용품 > 어류/수족관 용품 > 수족관 에어스톤/디퓨저: 에어 디퓨저; 디스크 에어스톤; 표준 에어스톤; 튜브 에어스톤; 벽면 에어스톤
hr-HR: Životinje i potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za ribe i vodeni svijet > Raspršivači i difuzori zraka za akvarij: Difuzori zraka; Raspršivači zraka u obliku diska; Standardni raspršivači zraka; Cjevasti raspršivači zraka; Zidni raspršivači zraka